California, session 20252026, SB1172.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53084.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:53084.6. (a) As used in this section:(1) “Consultant” means a person or a business that provides services, including, but not limited to, legal, lobbying, or financial services, for facilitating, negotiating, and advising on a tax sharing agreement.(2) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, or special district.(3) (A) “Tax sharing agreement” means any form of agreement that would result, directly or indirectly, in the payment, transfer, diversion, or rebate of any tax revenue resulting from the imposition of a sales and use tax under the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) to any person for any purpose.(B) “Tax sharing agreement” shall not include an agreement between a local agency and a consultant to identify and recover tax revenues that have been incorrectly allocated and distributed to another local agency.(b) A local agency shall not pay compensation to a consultant with respect to a specific tax sharing agreement that exceeds the lower of the following:(1) Five percent of the total tax revenues shared pursuant to the tax sharing agreement.(2) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).(c) A consultant shall not receive compensation from proceeds of a tax sharing agreement more than three years after the effective date, or completion of the project phase that directly benefits from the agreement, whichever occurs first. (d) This section shall not apply to the following:(1) Local agency staff directly employed by the jurisdiction executing the agreement.(2) Technical consultants providing noncompensated advisory services.(e) The Legislature finds and declares that ensuring fairness in tax sharing agreements across the state is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.(f) This section shall only apply to tax sharing agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2027.